Utah statutes.
31A-27a-106.   Exemption from fees.
The receiver may not be required to pay any of the following fees to a public
officer of this state:
(1)  filing fees;
(2)  recording fees;
(3)  transcript fees;
(4)  copying fees;
(5)  certification fees; or
(6)  authentication fees.
